Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in  sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act, unless the context clearly re-
quires another meaning:
(1) “City” means a city, town or other community  located in this state with a population
of 2,500 or less.
(2) “District association” means Oregon’s Economic Development Districts, an organiza-
tion consisting  of member districts designated by the United States Economic Development
Administration.
(3) “Grant administrator” means a person that provides fiscal  administration, grant
compliance, grant reporting and other similar administrative services required  by grant-
awarding entities.
(4) “Member district” means a district that is a member of Oregon’s  Economic Develop-
ment Districts.
(5) “Rural area” means an  area located in this state that is entirely outside the ac-
knowledged Portland Metropolitan Area Regional Urban Growth  Boundary and the acknowl-
edged urban growth boundaries of all cities with populations of 30,000 or more.
(6) “Rural capacity builder” means a person that assists communities in rural areas:
(a) To determine local priorities for community and economic development;
(b) To develop tools, processes and partnerships to address local needs; or
(c) By providing grant writing services.
(7) “Rural county” means a county of this state with a population of 12,000 or less.
(8) “Rural grant services” means assistance to communities in rural areas in:
(a) Identifying funding opportunities  to meet community and economic development
needs; and
(b) Applying for grants.
(9) “Rural jurisdictions” means:
(a) Rural counties; and
(b) Federally recognized Indian tribes, cities, school districts and special districts located
in rural areas.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall distribute moneys
in the Oregon Rural Capacity Fund established  under section 6 of this 2021 Act to provide
resources to Oregon’s  Economic Development Districts for the purposes of assisting rural
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-A) Page 1
jurisdictions to learn about, successfully  apply for and administer grants and other forms
of funding available from any public or private source.  The rural jurisdictions shall use such
resources solely to attain the staffing  and financial and technical capacity necessary to carry
out proactive strategies for workforce,  infrastructure, economic and community develop-
ment in the rural jurisdictions.
(2) The district association shall assist, or provide for assistance to,  rural jurisdictions
by means that include, but are not limited to:
(a) Outreach to the rural jurisdictions about grants and other forms of funding;
(b) Employment of grant writers or grant administrators to directly assist  the rural ju-
risdictions in applying for grants and other forms of funding;
(c) Direct assistance in administering grants awarded to the rural jurisdictions; and
(d) Working with  state agencies to coordinate investments in water and sewer systems,
roads and other elements of basic infrastructure needed in cities in rural areas.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall:
(1) Develop the policy guiding the implementation of sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(2) Communicate the policy and the purposes set forth  in section 2 of this 2021 Act to
underserved rural jurisdictions.
(3) Determine the amount of moneys available for distribution to  Oregon’s Economic
Development Districts under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(4) Consult  and coordinate with the district association on the distribution of moneys
under section 2 of this 2021 Act.  When consulting with the district association on the use
of moneys, the department and the district association shall consider:
(a) Which rural jurisdictions are most in  need of the assistance provided under sections
1 to 6 of this 2021 Act; and
(b) The geographical balance of the distributions and assistance.
(5) Work with  the district association to determine the number and location of the grant
writers and rural capacity builders to be hired with the moneys distributed.
(6) Make the distributions under section 2 of this 2021 Act in accordance with  the policy
and priorities developed under this section from moneys in the Oregon Rural Capacity Fund
established under section 6 of this 2021 Act.
(7) Oversee the rural grant services provided under sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(8) Periodically consult with the League of Oregon Cities, the Association of Oregon
Counties, the Oregon School Boards Association and the  Special Districts Association of
Oregon on the implementation of sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) This section applies to a member district that  receives moneys pursuant
to section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) The member district shall expend the moneys solely to  provide grant writing, grant
administration, rural grant and rural capacity building  services to rural jurisdictions for the
purposes set forth in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(b) The moneys received by the member district, and the activities of the member district
in expending the moneys, shall  supplement and may not supplant the resources and activities
of the member district.
(c) The member district may not use moneys received pursuant to  section 2 of this 2021
Act to apply for grants for purposes unrelated to  the purposes set forth in section 2 of this
2021 Act.
(d) For purposes of a member district’s assistance to rural jurisdictions under this  sec-
tion, the Oregon  Business Development Department may enter into an agreement with a
regional solutions advisory committee appointed pursuant to ORS 284.754 for a  region in
which the member district is located in order to coordinate the activities of the member
district, including the use of the moneys distributed to the member district, and  the regional
solutions team for the region.
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-A) Page 2
(e) The member district shall manage, document and submit  quarterly reports to the
department about the assistance the member district provides to  rural jurisdictions under
this section. The reports shall contain at a minimum all applicable information required  un-
der section 5 (2) of this 2021 Act.
(3)(a) The member district may hire an  individual under this section as an employee or
an independent contractor.
(b) The member district may assign individuals hired  under this section to provide the
services described in subsection (2)(a) of this section to more than one rural jurisdiction.
SECTION 5. (1) Not later  than September 15 of each year, the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department shall provide a brief report, in the  manner required under ORS 192.245,
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development, that
describes the activities that Oregon’s Economic Development Districts engaged  in for the
previous 12-month period under sections 1 to  6 of this 2021 Act and the results of those ac-
tivities.
(2) At a minimum, the report required under this section shall identify:
(a) The rural jurisdictions that requested assistance funded by the district association;
(b) The rural jurisdictions that received such assistance;
(c) The populations served by the rural jurisdictions that requested  assistance funded by
the district association;
(d) The populations served by the rural jurisdictions that received such assistance;
(e) The number of  funding opportunities, and the dollar amount of private and public
funds, separately stated, that the rural jurisdictions applied for with assistance funded by the
district association;
(f) The number of funding opportunities from which the rural  jurisdictions received
funding with such assistance, and the  dollar amount of private and public funding so re-
ceived, separately stated;
(g) The multiplier effects of  grants and other forms of funding received by the rural ju-
risdictions with assistance funded by the district association;
(h) The expected  effect of grants and other forms of funding received by the rural juris-
dictions with assistance  funded by the district association on the timing of the commence-
ment and completion of projects;
(i) The number of jobs created by rural jurisdictions  that received assistance under
sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act;
(j) The return on  investment of moneys distributed to member districts under section 2
of this 2021 Act; and
(k) Any other information the department considers important to include in the report.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Rural Capacity Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Oregon Rural Capacity
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or  otherwise transferred or credited to the fund by the Legis-
lative Assembly;
(b) Moneys from the federal government, state agencies or local governments transferred
or otherwise credited to the fund;
(c) Amounts donated or otherwise given to the fund;
(d) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts from any source transferred or otherwise credited to the fund.
(3)(a) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business  Devel-
opment Department for the purpose of making  the expenditures set forth in this subsection.
(b) The department may retain an amount equal to five  percent of moneys appropriated
or otherwise transferred or credited to the fund to pay the for the  administrative and oper-
ational expenses of department under sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-A) Page 3
(c) The department shall distribute the balance of the moneys in accordance  with section
2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for
deposit in the Oregon Rural Capacity Fund established under section 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2)(a) As used in this subsection, “person” means each of:
(A) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department; and
(B) Oregon’s Economic Development Districts.
(b) Notwithstanding the date specified in subsection (1) of this section, a person may take
any action before the date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the
person to exercise, on and after the date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers respectively conferred on the person by sections 1 to 6 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 9.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-A) Page 4